apertium-glk.glk.dix
    <pardef n="نز/ِئن__vblex" c="negative preterite (past) e-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ه‌یی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ِئن</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ندَ/ئن__vblex" c="negative preterite (past) a-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>

      <e><p><l>یی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-2-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ئن</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="زِئن"><p><l>نز</l><r>ز</r></p><par n="نز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دَئن"><p><l>ندَ</l><r>دَ</r></p><par n="ندَ/ئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ایسَن"><p><l>نِیسَه</l><r>ایس</r></p><par n="ندَ/ئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ترسئن"><p><l>نترسه</l><r>ترس</r></p><par n="نز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تَوَدن"><p><l>تَنودَه</l><r>تَوَ</r></p><par n="ندَ/ئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="دِئن"><p><l>نده</l><r>دِ</r></p><par n="نز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="شکستن"><p><l>نیشکنه</l><r>شکس</r></p><par n="نز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="فَرسن"><p><l>فَنرسه</l><r>فَر</r></p><par n="نز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="هئن"><p><l>نهه</l><r>ه</r></p><par n="نز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="وَورسن"><p><l>وَنورسه</l><r>وَور</r></p><par n="نز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="چِئن"><p><l>نچه</l><r>چِ</r></p><par n="نز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کشن"><p><l>نکشه</l><r>ک</r></p><par n="نز/ِئن__vblex"/></e>
